California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------

9455.

A sale or conveyance of any property held by a resource conservation district, executed by the president and secretary thereof, in accordance with a resolution of the directors of the district, when the property is sold for a valuable consideration, shall convey good title to the property so conveyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9456.

The proceeds of a sale described in Section 9455 shall be paid into the county treasury of the principal county for the use of the district, or to the district treasury, if the district operates pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9521.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 15.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9457.

The board of directors shall adopt purchasing policies and procedures governing the purchase of supplies and equipment as required by Sections 54201 through 54204, inclusive, of the Government Code. The policies shall be in writing, copies of which shall be available for public distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Inclusion of Lands [9481. - 9481.]

9481.

The inclusion of additional lands in a district shall be made in accordance with the District Reorganization Act of 1965, Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code, except that unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the lands included in any district need not be contiguous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 16.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Dissolution [9491. - 9491.]

9491.

A district may be dissolved in accordance with the provisions of the District Reorganization Act of 1965, Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. District Finance [9501. - 9546.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regular Assessments [9501. - 9513.]

9501.

The directors shall, on or before January 1 of the calendar year during which an assessment is to be levied for the first time, notify the State Board of Equalization as provided in Revenue and Taxation Code Sections 756 and 759 and, annually on or before August lst, furnish the county auditor and the board of supervisors an estimate in writing of the amount of money necessary to be raised by assessment for the purposes of the district for the next ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

If the district lies in more than one county the directors shall divide the amount of the estimate in the proportion to the value of the land in the district lying in each county. The value shall be determined from the last assessment rolls of the counties. The directors shall furnish the auditors and boards of supervisors of each of the respective counties a statement of the part of the estimate apportioned to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

The total amount of the estimate shall be sufficient to raise the amount of money necessary during the ensuing year to pay the incidental expenses of the district, the costs of the work which the directors may deem advisable to be done during the ensuing year, the estimated costs of repairs to and maintenance of the property and works of the district, and the estimated expenses of any action or proceeding to which the district is or may be a party, including the cost of employing engineers and attorneys.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9504.

Assessments levied pursuant to this article shall be known as regular assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9505.

The regular assessment in any one year shall not exceed two cents ($0.02) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the land, exclusive of improvements, trees, and mineral rights, within the district. The valuation shall be determined according to the last assessment roll, reduced proportionately when mineral rights, standing trees, or timber are involved.

The cost to the assessor, if any, of recomputing assessed valuations in accordance with this section shall be paid by the district requesting an assessment levy pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

The board of supervisors of each county in which there lies any portion of the district shall, annually, at the time of levying county taxes, levy an assessment on the land exclusive of improvements, trees, and mineral rights, within the county and within the district to be known as the “ ____ (name of district) Resource Conservation District assessment,” sufficient to raise the amount reported to them in the estimate of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9507.

The rate, as determined by the board, shall be such as will produce, after due allowance for delinquency, the amount determined as necessary to be raised by taxation on the secured roll. On or before September 1st of each year the board shall fix the rate, composed of the number of cents or fraction thereof for each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of land exclusive of improvements and mineral rights, such as will produce, after due allowance for delinquency, the amount determined as necessary to be raised by taxation on the secured roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9508.

If the board fails to levy the assessment the auditor of the county shall do so, providing the directors have requested the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9509.

The assessment shall be computed and entered on the assessment roll by the auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9510.

The provisions of law relating to the levy and collection of county taxes and the duties of county officers with respect thereto, insofar as they are applicable and not in conflict with this chapter, are hereby adopted and made part of this chapter. Said officers are liable on their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of their duties under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.

The treasurers of each of the counties, other than the principal county, shall, not less than twice a year or upon order of the directors, settle with the directors and pay to the treasurer of the principal county all money belonging to the district and in their possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9512.

If during the current fiscal year the directors are not, by reason of the fact that no assessment has been levied, collecting a regular assessment levied during the year immediately preceding, then notwithstanding other provisions of this code, the board of supervisors in each county in which a soil conservation district, or a portion thereof is located may, upon a showing by the directors that funds are needed for the purposes of the district for the current year, appropriate money from the general fund of the county for the use of said district in an amount equal, during any one year, to the amount which said district could have raised by assessment, as limited by this code, in said current year, or so much thereof as may be required. This provision shall not be deemed to prohibit the board of supervisors from appropriating to such districts sums in excess of these amounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9513.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. District Fiscal Procedure [9521. - 9530.]

9521.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the treasury of the principal county is the depository of all of the funds of the district. 

(b) As an alternative to using the county treasury as depository, a district may adopt a resolution transferring responsibility for the district treasury to the board of directors of the district, which shall deposit district funds as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Following adoption of the resolution, the provisions of this article relating to the county treasurer and county treasury shall not apply to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

9522.

The treasurer of the principal county shall receive and receipt for all money of the district and place the same to the credit of the district. He is responsible on his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement, in the manner provided in this article, of the money of the district held by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9523.

The treasurer shall pay out money of the district only upon warrants approved by the county auditor, drawn upon order of the board of directors signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

Whenever two or more districts enter into a joint powers agreement, or whenever a district enters into a joint powers agreement with other agencies of the state, the agency or entity administering the agreement shall determine where its funds shall be deposited and how such funds shall be paid out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9524.

The treasurer shall report in writing at each regular meeting of the directors and as often at other times as the directors may request the amount of money on hand, and the receipts and disbursements since his last report. The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9525.

The directors or other officers or employees of a district shall have no power to incur any indebtedness or liability in excess of the amount of money available under the provisions of this division. Any debt or liability incurred in excess of the express provisions of this division is void. Except, however, that nothing in this section shall prevent the directors from borrowing from such federal, state, county, public or private funds which are, or which may in the future become, available to the directors for the furthering of the work of the district in any manner or by the sale of bonds payable solely from any revenue of the district, if the assets acquired by such a loan or bond constitute the entire security for the loan or bond and if no indebtedness or liability is incurred by the directors in excess of the amount of the assets acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9526.

The directors at their regular monthly meeting in July of each year shall make and file with the secretary a verified statement of the financial condition of the district showing particularly the receipts and disbursements of the preceding fiscal year together with the source of the receipts and the purposes of the disbursements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9527.

The annual financial statement shall be posted or published as the directors may determine. Such posting or publication shall be commenced within 10 days after the financial statement is filed with the secretary. If it is posted it shall be posted at the place of regular meeting of the directors and copies thereof shall be made available for delivery to any landowner in the district upon his request to the secretary. If the statement is published, it shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the principal county and in each other county in which any part of the district lies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9528.

An annual audit of the books, accounts, records, papers, money, and securities shall be made as required by Section 26909 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9529.

The directors of the district may, at such times as they deem necessary, determine whether any portion of the money on deposit in the treasury of the principal county is not necessary for immediate use; and if so, it shall determine the amount, which amount shall thereupon be designated as “surplus money” and transferred to a “surplus money account” in the treasury of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9530.

(a) “Surplus moneys,” as determined pursuant to Section 9529, shall be invested exclusively in bonds or interest-bearing notes or obligations of the United States, or those for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(b) Interest earned and other increment derived from any investment under this section shall be credited to the surplus money account for investment under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Claims [9541. - 9541.]

9541.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. District Election Costs [9545. - 9546.]

9545.

Except as provided in Section 9546, the county shall pay any and all costs attributable to the conduct of district elections and shall be reimbursed for such expenditure the following year by a special assessment levied and collected in the same manner as regular assessments pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 9501), except that the limitations set forth in Section 9505 shall not apply to such assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 305.)
-------------------------------------------

9546.

The county shall bill any candidate for district office for the actual prorated costs of printing, handling, and translating his statement of qualifications contained in the voter’s pamphlet accompanying the sample ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 305.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. District Reorganization [9601. - 9635.]



  ARTICLE 1. Consolidation [9601. - 9601.]

9601.

Any two or more contiguous districts, or districts situated within the same geophysical area, organized under this division may consolidate in accordance with the provisions of the District Reorganization Act of 1965, Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Partition [9611. - 9611.]

9611.

A partition of a district shall be made in accordance with the District Reorganization Act of 1965, Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Changing Name of District [9621. - 9627.]

9621.

A district may change its name by action of the board of supervisors of the principal county as provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9622.

Whenever in the judgment of the board of directors it is for the best interest of a district that its name be changed to a stated name, it may pass a resolution reciting such fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9623.

A copy of the resolution shall be forwarded to the board of supervisors of the principal county with the request that the name of the district be changed to the stated name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9624.

The board of supervisors of the principal county shall consider this request at their next regular meeting and may grant or deny the request. Their action shall be officially recorded in their minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9625.

If the action of the board of supervisors on this request is negative, they shall forward a copy of the resolution to the board of directors initiating the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9626.

If the action of the board of supervisors on this request is favorable, it shall cause certified copies of the resolution to be forwarded to the board of directors initiating the request, the boards of supervisors and county clerks of all the other counties in which any portion of the district lies and the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9627.

On acknowledgment of the change of name by the Secretary of State, the name of the district shall be considered changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transferring Lands From One District to Another [9635. - 9635.]

9635.

One district may transfer land within its boundaries to a district contiguous thereto in accordance with the provisions of the District Reorganization Act of 1965, Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Federal Aid Projects [9751. - 9757.]

9751.

In order to carry out the purposes of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act enacted by the Congress of the United States, the State Resource Conservation Commission (hereinafter referred to as “commission”) is hereby designated as the agency of the State of California to administer any state plan authorized by this chapter which shall be approved by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States (hereinafter referred to as the “Secretary of Agriculture”) for the State of California pursuant to the provisions of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9752.

The commission is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to formulate and submit to the Secretary of Agriculture, in conformity with the provisions of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, a state plan for each calendar year beginning with the year 1949. It shall be the purpose of each such plan to promote such utilization of land and such farming practices as the commission finds will tend, in conjunction with the operation of such other plans as may be approved for other states by the Secretary of Agriculture, to preserve and improve soil fertility, promote the economic use of land, diminish the exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of natural soil resources, and reestablish and maintain the ratio between the purchasing power of the net income per person on farms and that of the income per person not on farms as defined in subsection (a) of Section 7 of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act. Each such plan shall provide for adjustments in the utilization of land and in farming practices, through agreements with producers or through other voluntary methods, and for benefit payments in connection therewith, and also for such methods of administration not in conflict with any law of this state and such reports as the Secretary of Agriculture finds necessary for the effective administration of the plan and for ascertaining whether the plan is being carried out according to its terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9753.

Upon the acceptance of each such plan by the Secretary of Agriculture, the commission is authorized and empowered to accept and receive all grants of money made pursuant to the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act for the purpose of enabling the state to carry out the provisions of such plan, and all such funds, together with any moneys which may be appropriated by the state for such purpose, shall be available to the commission for expenditures necessary in carrying out the plan, including administrative expenses, expenditures in connection with educational programs in aid of the plan, and benefit payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9754.

In carrying out the provisions of each such plan, the commission shall have power: to employ such agents or agencies, and to establish such agencies, as it may find to be necessary; to cooperate with local and state agencies and with agencies of other states and of the federal government; to conduct research and educational activities in connection with the formulation and operation of such plan; to enter into agreements with producers, and to provide by other voluntary methods, for adjustments in the utilization of land and in farming practices, and for payments in connection therewith in amounts which the commission determines to be fair and reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9755.

For the purpose of carrying out each such plan according to its terms, the commission is hereby authorized to delegate any of the powers herein conferred to such agents or agencies as may be designated by the commission and approved by the Secretary of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9757.

Nothing herein shall be construed or operate to impose any obligation or liability upon the commission or other than as herein specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Improvement Districts in Resource Conservation Districts [9801. - 9924.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation [9801. - 9821.]

9801.

For purposes of cooperating with landowners or any other agency or for purposes of cooperating with the United States under provisions of the Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act (Chapter 656, Public Law 566, 83rd Cong., 2nd Session), and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, lands which need not be contiguous may be formed into an improvement district for constructing, both in or for the improvement district, one or more of the following:

(a) Flood prevention improvements, including structural and land treatment measures.

(b) Improvements for the agricultural phases of conservation, development, utilization, drainage disposal, and distribution of water.

(c) Improvements for prevention or stabilization of soil erosion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.

As used in connection with improvement districts:

(a) “Improvement” includes operation, maintenance, change, and acquisition of existing works, and the construction, operation, and maintenance of new works. 

(b) “Construction” includes, but is not limited to, the preparation and execution of plans, maintenance and operation.

(c) “Real property” means land only.

(d) “Owner of real property” means “owner of land”.

(e) “Improvement district” means a resource conservation district improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter.

(f) “Land” means land within the improvement district or proposed improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9803.

The formation of an improvement district shall be proposed and the petition therefor shall be signed by two-thirds or more in number of the owners of real property in the proposed improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9804.

A petition for the formation of an improvement district shall contain all of the following:

(a) Statement of the plans of the proposed improvement.

(b) Description of the land of the proposed improvement district.

(c) Names of the owners of all real property within the proposed improvement district with their last known addresses.

(d) Description and assessed value of the real property owned in the proposed improvement district by each owner, which shall be according to the next preceding equalized assessment roll. District owned real property in the proposed improvement district shall be described whether or not it appears on the next preceding assessment roll.

(e) Signatures of the petitioners.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

The petition, all proceedings in reference to it, the improvement district, and the real property in it shall be designated by a number.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9806.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9807.

A petition to form an improvement district shall be filed with the secretary of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9808.

Upon receipt of a petition to form an improvement district the directors shall cause a survey to be made of the proposed improvements, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9809.

If the survey shows that the improvements are feasible, the directors shall cause to be prepared the following:

(a) Plans and specifications of the improvements proposed to be constructed when the petition proposes the construction of improvements.

(b) An estimate of the cost of the proposed improvements, which may include an amount not in excess of 10 percent of the aggregate cost of the proposed improvements to create a reserve fund to be used and applied as additional security for the payment of principal of and interest on any warrants of the improvement district issued against assessments levied for the payment of the cost of the proposed improvements.

(c) Statement of the proposed assessment for the cost of the proposed improvements apportioned to each parcel of real property in the proposed improvement district as the parcels appear on the last equalized assessment roll and to district owned real property in the proposed improvement district whether or not it appears on the last equalized assessment roll, which assessments shall be apportioned in accordance with the assessed value of the real property, as such value is shown on the next preceding equalized assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9810.

If there are any, the plans and specifications, estimate of cost, and the statement of the proposed assessment shall be filed with the secretary of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9811.

After the filing of the formation petition, and if any, the plans and specifications, the estimate of cost, and statement of the proposed assessment, the directors shall give notice of a hearing upon the petition, and if a special assessment is to be levied in the improvement district pursuant to this chapter, the notice shall also state that the hearing is called to determine whether or not the special assessment should be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9812.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by all of the following:

(a) Posting a notice in three public places within the proposed improvement district.

(b) Publication of the notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the principal county of the district.

(c) Mailing a copy of the notice to the last known address of all of the owners of real property in the proposed improvement district to the addresses appearing in the petition.

The notices shall be posted and mailed not less than 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9813.

At the hearing the directors shall hear any objections coming before it to any of the following:

(a) The petition.

(b) The formation of the improvement district.

(c) The real property to be included within the improvement district.

(d) The plans and specifications.

(e) The estimate of cost.

(f) The proposed assessment.

(g) The apportionment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9814.

At the hearing the directors shall make any changes in reference to the matters set forth in Section 9813 as they consider proper. The directors may exclude any part of the real property described in the petition from the proposed improvement district and may include additional real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9815.

If any additional real property is included in the proposed improvement district, the hearing shall be continued and the owners of the added real property given personal notice of not less than 20 days of the addition of the land to the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9816.

The directors may include in the plans and specifications such terms and conditions as to the respective parcels of real property in the improvement district with respect to tolls, charges, assessments, or the conservation or use of soil and water or any other matters as the directors deem necessary or proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9817.

Regardless of any findings made by the directors if more than one-third in number of the holders of title to the real property within a proposed improvement district object at the hearing to its formation or the levy of the proposed assessment, the directors shall deny the petition, and no further proceedings shall be had on it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9818.

If at the hearing the directors find that it would not be for the best interests of the district and the proposed improvement district to form the improvement district the directors shall order the proceedings dismissed without prejudice to their renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9819.

If the directors find that it would be for the best interests of the district and the proposed improvement district to form the improvement district, they shall make and enter in their minutes a final order:

(a) Approving the petition.

(b) Forming the improvement district.

(c) Levying the assessment if any is provided for and if the assessment is necessary.

(d) Apportioning the assessment, if levied, to the real property in the improvement district according to assessed value as shown on the next preceding equalized assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9820.

The order shall contain a description of the lands within the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9821.

The secretary shall cause a certified copy of the order creating the improvement district to be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any land of the improvement district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessments [9831. - 9842.]

9831.

Any assessment levied pursuant to Section 9819 shall include both of the following sums:

(a) An amount equal to interest on any deferred payments at a rate not exceeding 7 percent each year.

(b) An amount equal to 10 percent more than all other sums to be raised by the assessment, in order to provide for anticipated delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9832.

The assessment may be made payable in not more than 10 annual installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9833.

The directors, on or before the 15th day of August of each year, shall furnish the auditor and board of supervisors of each county in which any portion of the improvement lies a statement in writing of the amounts of the installments of the improvement district assessment, if any, due for the next ensuing fiscal year in respect of each parcel of real property within the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9834.

Each annual installment of the improvement district assessments shall be collected by county officers in the same manner and at the same times as county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9835.

The provision of law relating to the collection of county taxes and the duties of county officers with respect thereto, insofar as they are applicable and not in conflict with this chapter, are hereby adopted and made a part of this chapter. Said officers are liable on their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of their duties under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9836.

The treasurers of each of the counties, other than the principal county, shall, not less than twice a year or upon order of the directors, settle with the directors and pay to the principal county all money belonging to the improvement district and in their possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 686, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

9837.

The assessment and each installment of it shall be and remain a lien on the real property in the improvement district in the same manner as and in addition to the annual assessment of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9838.

Upon a change or resubdivision of any parcel of real property in an improvement district, the directors upon their own initiative or upon a petition of the owner of the parcel so changed or resubdivided, may reapportion the improvement district assessment upon the parcel, and the order of reapportionment shall be recorded in the same manner as the order levying the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9839.

If the actual cost of the improvements is substantially less than the estimated cost the assessment may be reduced proportionately on each parcel by recomputing it based on actual costs with the percentage and interest provided for in Section 9831 added thereto. The reapportionment or a statement that the assessment on each parcel has been reduced by a designated percentage shall be recorded in the same manner as the order levying the original assessment.

Installments of assessments levied on district-owned real property becoming due while the real property is still owned by the district shall be paid by the district. Conveyance of such real property into private ownership shall not release the lien thereon of the assessment and the unpaid installments of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9840.

If the assessments levied upon real property in an improvement district are insufficient to pay the cost of improvements or the warrants issued for the improvements, a supplemental assessment shall be levied upon all of the real property in the improvement district sufficient to pay the cost or the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9841.

The procedure followed in making the supplemental levy shall be substantially the same as for making the original levy, except that no petition is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9842.

Whenever it is desired to do additional work or acquire additional property in or for an improvement district, upon the petition of two-thirds in number of the owners of real property in the improvement district, an additional assessment may be levied substantially in the same manner as the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inclusion of Land [9851. - 9855.]

9851.

If at any time it is desired to include additional real property within an improvement district, a petition for inclusion signed by the owners of real property to be included may be filed with the directors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9852.

The inclusion petition shall describe the boundaries of the improvement district as enlarged by the proposed inclusions and give the names and addresses of the owners of the additional real property in substantially the same manner as in the original petition for forming an improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.

The same proceedings shall be had on the improvement district inclusion petition as upon the original petition for the formation of an improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9854.

The directors may prescribe any conditions upon the inclusion of the real property that they deem just.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.

If any conditions not contained in the petition for inclusion are prescribed by the directors the real property shall not be included until two-thirds in number of the petitioners approve the conditions in writing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvement District Management [9861. - 9870.]

9861.
